California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) Of the amount subject to this section, twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to desert community towns in the County of San Bernardino, incorporated after 1990, with a population estimate of less than 22,000 according to the United States Census Bureau Population Estimates as of July 1, 2016, that have adopted a master plan as of 2008 that includes recommendations for the development of public facilities that will assist in achieving active recreational projects, including aquatic and fitness centers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Investments in Protecting, Enhancing, and Accessing California’s Local and Regional Outdoor Spaces [80060. - 80066.]

80060.

For purposes of this chapter, “district” means any regional park district, regional park and open-space district, or regional open-space district formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5, any recreation and park district formed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 5780) of Division 5, or any authority formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100). With respect to any community or unincorporated region that is not included within a district, and in which no city or county provides parks or recreational areas or facilities, “district” also means any other entity, including, but not limited to, a district operating multiple-use parklands pursuant to Division 20 (commencing with Section 71000) of the Water Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80061.

(a) The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for local park rehabilitation, creation, and improvement grants to local governments on a per capita basis. Grant recipients shall be encouraged to utilize awards to rehabilitate existing infrastructure and to address deficiencies in neighborhoods lacking access to the outdoors.

(b) The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to cities and districts in urbanized counties providing park and recreation services within jurisdictions of 200,000 or less in population. For purposes of this subdivision, “urbanized county”
 means a county with a population of 500,000 or more. An entity eligible to receive funds under this subdivision shall also be eligible to receive funds available under subdivision (a).

(c) Unless the project has been identified as serving a severely disadvantaged community, an entity that receives an award pursuant to this section shall be required to provide a match of 20 percent as a local share.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80062.

(a) (1) The department shall allocate 60 percent of the funds available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80061 to cities and districts, other than a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, open-space authority, or regional open-space district. Each city’s and district’s allocation shall be in the same ratio as the city’s or district’s population is to the combined total of the state’s population that is included in incorporated and unincorporated areas within the county, except that each city or district shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). If the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, the population in the overlapping area shall be attributed to each jurisdiction in proportion to the extent
 to which each operates and manages parks and recreational areas and facilities for that population. If the boundary of a city overlaps the boundary of a district, and in the area of overlap the city does not operate and manage parks and recreational areas and facilities, all grant funds for that area shall be allocated to the district.

(2) On or before April 1, 2020, a city and a district that are subject to paragraph (1), and whose boundaries overlap, shall collaboratively develop and submit to the department a specific plan for allocating the grant funds in accordance with the formula specified in paragraph (1). If, by that date, the plan has not been developed and submitted to the department, the director shall determine the allocation of the grant funds between the affected jurisdictions.

(b) (1) The department shall allocate 40 percent of the funds
 available pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80061 to counties and regional park districts, regional park and open-space districts, open-space authorities formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), and regional open-space districts formed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 5500) of Chapter 3 of Division 5.

(2) Each county’s allocation under paragraph (1) shall be in the same ratio that the county’s population is to the total state population, except that each county shall be entitled to a minimum allocation of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000).

(3) In any county that embraces all or part of the territory of a regional park district, regional park and open-space district, open-space authority, or regional open-space district, and whose board of directors is not the county board of supervisors, the amount allocated to the county shall be
 apportioned between that district and the county in proportion to the population of the county that is included within the territory of the district and the population of the county that is outside the territory of the district.

(c) For the purpose of making the calculations required by this section, population shall be determined by the department, in cooperation with the Department of Finance, on the basis of the most recent verifiable census data and other verifiable population data that the department may require to be furnished by the applicant city, county, or district.

(d) The Legislature intends all recipients of funds pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80061 to use those funds to supplement local revenues in existence on the effective date of the act adding this division. To receive an allocation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80061, the recipient shall not
 reduce the amount of funding otherwise available to be spent on parks or other projects eligible for funds under this division in its jurisdiction. A one-time allocation of other funding that has been expended for parks or other projects, but which is not available on an ongoing basis, shall not be considered when calculating a recipient’s annual expenditures. For purposes of this subdivision, the Controller may request fiscal data from recipients for the preceding three fiscal years. Each recipient shall furnish the data to the Controller no later than 120 days after receiving the request from the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80063.

(a) The director of the department shall prepare and adopt criteria and procedures for evaluating applications for grants allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 80061. The application shall be accompanied by certification that the project is consistent with the park and recreation element of the applicable city or county general plan or the district park recreation plan, as the case may be.

(b) To utilize available grant funds as effectively as possible, overlapping and adjoining jurisdictions and applicants with similar objectives are encouraged to combine projects and submit a joint application. A recipient may allocate all or a portion of its per capita share for a regional or state
 project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80065.

(a) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to regional park districts, counties, and regional open-space districts, open-space authorities formed pursuant to Division 26 (commencing with Section 35100), joint powers authorities, and eligible nonprofit organizations on a competitive grant basis to create, expand, improve, rehabilitate, or restore parks and park facilities, including, but not limited to, trails, regional trail networks, regional sports complexes, low-cost accommodations in park facilities, and visitor, outdoor, and interpretive facilities serving youth and communities of color.

(b) In awarding moneys, the department shall encourage
 applicants seeking funds for acquisition projects to perform projects in conjunction with new or enhanced public use and public access opportunities.

(c) Preference may be given to multiuse trail projects over single-use trail projects.

(d) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), of the amount subject to this section, the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for projects in units of the state parks system that are managed by nonprofit organizations that have entered into operating agreements with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80066.

The sum of forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants, awarded proportionally based on populations served, to local agencies that have obtained voter approval between November 1, 2012, through November 30, 2018, inclusive, for revenue enhancement measures aimed at improving and enhancing local or regional park infrastructure. A recipient of a grant under this section shall receive at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the purposes of the revenue enhancement measure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Restoring California’s Natural, Historic, and Cultural Legacy [80070. - 80077.]

80070.

The sum of two hundred eighteen million dollars ($218,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for restoration, preservation, and protection of existing state park facilities and units. Eligible project types include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Protection of natural resources to provide climate resilience, water supply, and water quality benefits.

(b) Enhancement of access to state park facilities and units, including protection and improvement of lands adjacent to state park facilities to improve access or management efficiency.

(c) The provision
 of low-cost overnight accommodations in ways that enhance access and recreational opportunities for disadvantaged community residents and low-income park visitors.

(d) Implementation of projects that address the department’s backlog of deferred maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80071.

The department, in expending the funding available under this chapter, shall endeavor, where practical, to partner with cities, counties, nonprofit organizations, and nongovernmental organizations to maximize leveraging opportunities to enhance tourism, visitation, and visitor experiences.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80072.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80070, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available for enterprise projects that facilitate new or enhanced park use and user experiences and increase revenue generation to support operations of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80073.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80070, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for grants to local agencies that operate a unit of the state park system to address urgent need for the restoration of aging infrastructure.

(b) For the purpose of awarding a grant under this section, a local cost share of not less than 25 percent of the total costs of the project shall be required. The cost-sharing requirement may be waived or reduced for a disadvantaged community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80074.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80070, eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Food and Agriculture to provide for facility improvements for county fairs, district agricultural associations, including the Sixth District Agricultural Association, as described in Section 4101 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and the Forty-Fifth District Agricultural Association, citrus fruit fairs, and the California Exposition and State Fair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 559, Sec. 80.   (AB 2143)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

80075.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80070, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the department to provide for lower cost coastal accommodation project development in units of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80076.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80070, not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the department for the protection, restoration, and enhancement of the natural resource values of the state park system, which may include all of the following:

(a) Protection and improvement of water quality and biological health in streams, aquifers, and estuarine ecosystems.

(b) Protection and restoration of natural resources and ecosystems representative of California’s diverse landscapes, including landform, habitat, and biological community restoration.

(c) Acquisition, rehabilitation, restoration,
 protection, and expansion of wildlife corridors, including projects to improve connectivity and reduce barriers between habitat areas.

(d) Improvements of native ecosystem resilience and adaptation to climate change.

(e) Enhancement of the health of redwood forests in order to accelerate old growth characteristics, maximize carbon sequestration, improve water quality, and build climate resilience.

(f) Protection and enhancement of tribal cultural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80077.

(a) In expending funds made available pursuant to Section 80070, and giving first priority to the department’s criteria for expenditure of funds for deferred maintenance including infrastructure needs to protect public safety, the department shall use best efforts to expend at least ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in each of the following regions for state park units and properties deferred maintenance projects and projects that may increase tourism and visitor experiences in those regions:

(1) Central Valley, from the City of Sacramento to the base of the Tehachapi Mountains.

(2) Central Coast.

(3) East Bay.

(4) County of Imperial and the Coachella Valley.

(5) Inland Empire.

(b) To the extent the department is unable to allocate funds for parks deferred maintenance in the regions identified in this section, it shall report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the reasons it is unable to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Trails and Greenway Investment [80080. - 80081.]

80080.

(a) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency, working in cooperation with the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for competitive grants to local agencies, state conservancies, federally recognized Native American tribes, nonfederally recognized California Native American tribes listed on the California Tribal Consultation List maintained by the Native American Heritage Commission, joint powers authorities, and nonprofit organizations to provide nonmotorized infrastructure development and enhancements that promote new or alternate access to parks, waterways, outdoor recreational pursuits, and forested or other natural environments to encourage health-related active transportation and opportunities for Californians to reconnect with
 nature.

(b) Of the amount made available pursuant to this section, up to 25 percent may be made available to communities for innovative transportation projects that provide new and expanded outdoor experiences to disadvantaged youth.

(c) Alignment, development, and improvement of nonmotorized infrastructure and trails that lead to safer interconnectivity among parks, waterways, and natural areas may be encouraged.

(d) The Natural Resources Agency is encouraged, when designing guidelines for grants awarded under this chapter, to utilize existing program guidelines, including, if applicable, guidelines that have been established for the California Recreational Trails Act (Article 6 (commencing with Section 5070) of Chapter 1 of Division 5) and, to the extent possible, to design guidelines that are consistent with the
 California Recreational Trails Plan, as described in Article 6 (commencing with Section 5070) of Chapter 1 of Division 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80081.

Unless the project has been identified as serving a disadvantaged community, an entity that receives an award under this chapter shall be required to provide a match of 20 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Rural Recreation, Tourism, and Economic Enrichment Investment [80090. - 80090.]

80090.

(a) The sum of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available to the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to administer a competitive grant program for cities, counties, and districts in nonurbanized areas, that are eligible for a grant under the Roberti-Z’berg-Harris Urban Open-Space and Recreation Program Act (Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 5620) of Division 5). Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (e) of Section 5621 and for the purposes of this section, the definition of “nonurbanized area” shall be updated by the department to reflect current population levels. A nonurbanized area shall include counties with populations of less than 500,000 people and low population densities per square mile, as determined by the department. In awarding the grants, the department may
 consider the following factors:

(1) Whether the project would provide new recreational opportunities in rural communities that have demonstrated deficiencies and lack of outdoor infrastructure in support of economic and health-related goals.

(2) Whether the project proposes to acquire and develop lands to enhance residential recreation while promoting the quality of tourism experiences and the economic vitality of the community. These enhancements may include accessibility for individuals with disabilities, trails, bikeways, regional or destination-oriented recreational amenities, and visitor centers.

(3) Whether the project includes collaboration between public and nonprofit organizations, including, but not limited to, nonprofit land trusts, to facilitate public access to privately owned lands for regional trail
 development for wildlife viewing, recreation, or outdoor experiences for youth.

(b) Unless the project has been identified as serving a disadvantaged community, an entity that receives an award under this chapter shall be required to provide a match of 20 percent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. California River Recreation, Creek, and Waterway Improvements Program [80100. - 80101.]

80100.

(a) The sum of one hundred sixty-two million dollars ($162,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants pursuant to the California River Parkways Act of 2004 (Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5750) of Division 5) and the Urban Streams Restoration Program pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code. Eligible projects shall include, but are not limited to, projects that protect and enhance urban creeks.

(1) (A) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($37,500,000) shall be available to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy. Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 5753, of that amount, fifteen million dollars
 ($15,000,000) shall be available for projects within the San Fernando Valley that protect or enhance the Los Angeles River watershed and its tributaries or headwaters, pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000).

(B) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, thirty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($37,500,000) shall be available to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy.

(C) Funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be expended pursuant to Section 79508 of the Water Code and Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600) and Division 23 (commencing with Section 33000). 

(2) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000) shall be available to the Santa Ana River
 Conservancy Program pursuant to Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 31170) of Division 21. To the extent possible, the conservancy shall distribute funds equitably geographically along the Santa Ana River.

(3) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the Lower American River Conservancy Program pursuant to Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 5845) of Division 5.

(4) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for projects supporting the preservation of the Los Gatos Creek and Upper Guadalupe River Watersheds and the protection of associated redwoods.

(5) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision,
 three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for projects supporting a comprehensive regional use management plan for the Russian River to reduce conflict and promote water supply improvements, habitat restoration and protection, cooperative public recreation, and commercial activity. 

(6) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy for river parkway projects along the Santa Margarita River in San Diego County. 

(7) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for improvements in and around Clear Lake and its watershed that demonstrate a comprehensive local and regional approach to
 restoration, public recreation, and management of the lake and its surrounding resources and recreation areas. 

(8) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available for purposes of the California River Parkways Act of 2004 (Chapter 3.8 (commencing with Section 5750)). 

(9) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be made available to the Department of Water Resources, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to implement the Urban Streams Restoration Program, established pursuant to Section 7048 of the Water Code. 

(10) Of the amount made available pursuant to this subdivision, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be
 available to the Natural Resources Agency for river parkway projects along the Los Angeles River in the City of Glendale that include connectivity to parks and open space in neighboring communities.

(b) Unless the project has been identified as serving a disadvantaged community, an entity that receives an award under this chapter shall be required to provide a match of 20 percent.

(c) To maximize cooperation and leverage resources, the Natural Resources Agency may give priority to projects that include partnerships among federal, state, and local agencies and to projects proposed by nonprofit organizations, including, but not limited to, nonprofit land trusts, and grants that may complement a natural community conservation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80101.

To the maximum extent feasible, the Natural Resources Agency is encouraged, when developing guidelines for grants awarded under this chapter, to utilize existing programs where communities enter into partnerships with state agencies for multibenefit projects to enhance and restore waterways, including, but not limited to, the Riverine Stewardship Technical Assistance program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. State Conservancy, Wildlife Conservation Board, and Authority Funding [80110. - 80116.]

80110.

The sum of seven hundred sixty-seven million dollars ($767,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as described in this chapter.

(a) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the Salton Sea Authority for capital outlay projects that provide air quality and habitat benefits and that implement the Natural Resources Agency’s Salton Sea Management Program. Of this amount, not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available to the Salton Sea Authority for purposes consistent with the New River Water Quality, Public Health, and River Parkway Development Program, as described in Section 71103.6.

(b) One hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000)
 shall be available to the following conservancies according to their governing statutes for their specified purposes in accordance with the following schedule: 

(1) Baldwin Hills Conservancy, six million dollars ($6,000,000).

(2) California Tahoe Conservancy, twenty-seven million dollars ($27,000,000).

(3) Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy, seven million dollars ($7,000,000).

(4) Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

(5) San Diego River Conservancy, twelve million dollars ($12,000,000).

(6) San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy, thirty million dollars
 ($30,000,000). 

(7) San Joaquin River Conservancy, six million dollars ($6,000,000).

(8) Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(9) Sierra Nevada Conservancy, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(10) State Coastal Conservancy, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for grants pursuant to Section 66704.5 of the Government Code for the purpose of San Francisco Bay restoration in accordance with the San Francisco Bay Restoration Authority Act (Title 7.25 (commencing with Section 66700) of the Government Code). Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 66704.5 of the Government Code, the State Coastal Conservancy shall establish a matching grant requirement for a grant awarded pursuant to this paragraph.

(c) One hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($137,000,000) shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80111.

The amount available to the Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 80110 is allocated as follows:

(a) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available for the development of regional conservation investment strategies that are not otherwise funded pursuant to Section 800 of the Streets and Highways Code or any other law.

(b) At least fifty-two million dollars ($52,000,000) shall be available for the acquisition, development, rehabilitation, restoration, protection, and expansion of habitat that furthers the implementation of natural community conservation plans adopted pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section
 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code) to help resolve resource conflicts by balancing communitywide conservation, planning, and economic activities or other large-scale habitat conservation plans that resolve resource conflicts with provisions for conservation, planning, and economic activities. Funding pursuant to this paragraph shall not be used to offset mitigation obligations otherwise required, but may be used as part of a funding partnership to enhance, expand, or augment conservation efforts required by mitigation.

(c) Up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000) may be granted to the University of California Natural Reserve System for matching grants for acquisition of land, construction and development of research facilities to improve the management of natural lands, for preservation of California’s wildlife resources, and to further research related to climate change. The Wildlife Conservation Board shall establish a matching
 grant requirement for grants awarded pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) The remainder of the amount available shall be available to the Wildlife Conservation Board to provide funding for the following projects:

(1) Projects to protect and enhance national recreation areas serving heavily urbanized areas or, in coordination with the State Lands Commission, to acquire an interest in federal public lands that may be proposed for sale or disposal.

(2) Projects according to the Wildlife Conservation Board’s governing statutes for its specified purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80112.

A receiving entity listed in subdivision (b) of Section 80110 shall develop and adopt a strategic master plan that identifies priorities and specific criteria for selecting projects for funding. The strategic plan shall include strategies for providing public access to conserved lands wherever feasible and be consistent with project goals and objectives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80113.

Entities, in expending the funding available under this chapter, shall endeavor, where practical, to partner with cities, counties, nonprofit organizations, joint powers authorities, and nongovernmental organizations to acquire open space and create urban greenway corridors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80114.

(a) Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80110, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is available to the Natural Resources Agency for implementation of voluntary agreements that provide multibenefit water quality, water supply, and watershed protection and restoration for the watersheds of the state to achieve the objectives of integrating regulatory and voluntary efforts, implementing an updated State Water Resources Control Board’s San Francisco Bay/Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Estuary Water Quality Control Plan, and ensuring ecological benefits. Expenditure of funds provided in this section shall be in accordance with the following:

(1) For the purposes of this section, watershed restoration includes activities to fund wetland habitat, salmon,
 steelhead, and fishery benefits, improve and restore river health, modernize stream crossings, culverts, and bridges, reconnect historical flood plains, install or improve fish screens, provide fish passages, restore river channels, restore or enhance riparian, aquatic, and terrestrial habitat, improve ecological functions, acquire from willing sellers conservation easements for riparian buffer strips, improve local watershed management, predation management, hatchery management, and remove sediment or trash.

(2) For purposes of this section, funds may be used for projects that measurably enhance streamflows at a time and location necessary to provide fisheries or ecosystem benefits or improvements that improve upon existing flow conditions. Project types that may be eligible include, but are not limited to, water transactions such as lease, purchase, or exchange, change of use petitions to benefit fish and wildlife, surface storage to be used
 to enhance streamflow, forbearance of water rights, changes in water management, groundwater storage and conjunctive use, habitat restoration projects that reshape the stream hydrograph, water efficiency generally, irrigation efficiency and water infrastructure improvements that save water and enable reshaping of the stream hydrograph, reconnecting flood flows with restored flood plains, and reservoir reoperations both at existing and new storage sites.

(b) The funds authorized by this section are available for direct expenditures and local assistance grants by the Natural Resources Agency, in consultation with the Department of Fish and Wildlife, that satisfy all of the following:

(1) Implement voluntary agreements executed by the Department of Fish and Wildlife with federal and state agencies, local government, water districts and agencies, and nongovernmental organizations that
 improve ecological flows and habitat for species, create water supply and regulatory certainty for water users, and foster a collaborative approach to facilitate implementation of the State Water Resources Control Board’s Bay-Delta Water Quality Control Plan.

(2) Implement a voluntary agreement submitted by the Department of Fish and Wildlife to the State Water Resources Control Board on or before June 1, 2018, for consideration.

(3) Implement a voluntary agreement that is of statewide significance, restores natural aquatic or riparian functions or wetlands habitat for birds and aquatic species, protects or promotes the restoration of endangered or threatened species, enhances the reliability of water supplies on a regional or interregional basis, and provides significant regional or statewide economic benefits.

(c) Funds provided by this section shall not be expended to pay the costs of the design, construction, operation, mitigation, or maintenance of Delta conveyance facilities.

(d) If the Department of Fish and Wildlife submits a voluntary agreement that satisfies paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), unencumbered funds available pursuant to this section to implement that voluntary agreement shall no longer be available 15 years after the date the State Water Resources Control Board approves the submitted agreement, at which point funds remaining available pursuant to this section shall become available to the Natural Resources Agency for the purposes of Sections 79732 and 79736 of the Water Code. If no voluntary agreements are submitted on or before June 1, 2018, any remaining funds shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for the purposes of Sections 79732 and 79736 of the Water Code. The Secretary of the Natural Resources
 Agency shall ensure an annual reporting of the funds pursuant to Section 80012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 237.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

80115.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80110, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available to the Department of Fish and Wildlife for capital improvements that address the Department of Fish and Wildlife’s backlog of deferred maintenance. Where practical, the Department of Fish and Wildlife shall partner with nonprofit organizations and nongovernmental organizations to inform the expenditure of these funds, enhance visitor experience, and where feasible, increase engagement with youth and disadvantaged communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------

80116.

Of the amount made available pursuant to Section 80110, one hundred seventy million dollars ($170,000,000) shall be available to the Natural Resources Agency for restoration activities identified in the Salton Sea Management Program Phase I: 10 Year Plan, dated March 2017, the final management plan report, and any subsequent revisions to this plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 852, Sec. 3.   Approved in Proposition 68 at the June 5, 2018, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Ocean, Bay, and Coastal Protection [80120. - 80121.]

80120.

The sum of one hundred seventy-five million dollars ($175,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to fund projects that enhance and protect coastal and ocean resources, as follows:

(a) The sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) shall be available for deposit into the California Ocean Protection Trust Fund for grants consistent with Section 35650. Priority shall be given to projects that conserve, protect, and restore marine wildlife and healthy ocean and coastal ecosystems with a focus on the state’s system of marine protected areas and sustainable fisheries.

(b) The sum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy
 to provide for lower cost coastal accommodation grants and project development to public agencies and nonprofit organizations.

(c) The sum of eighty-five million dollars ($85,000,000) shall be available to the State Coastal Conservancy for the protection of beaches, bays, wetlands, and coastal watershed resources pursuant to Division 21 (commencing with Section 31000). This shall include the acquisition of, or conservation easements on, land in or adjacent to the California coastal zone with open space, recreational, biological, cultural, scenic, or agricultural values, or lands adjacent to marine protected areas, including marine conservation areas, whose preservation will contribute to the ecological quality of those marine protected areas. This shall also include the protection of coastal agricultural resources pursuant to Section 31150 and projects to complete the California Coastal Trail pursuant to Section 31408.
